Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1206.01
Decommissioned, defined.

Decommissioned, when used in relation to a water well, shall mean the act of filling, sealing, and plugging a water well in accordance with the rules and regulations of the department.

Laws 1994, LB 981, § 14.